

[equation]

General Superfield Quantization Method. 

III. Construction of Quantization Scheme 
A.A. ReshetnyakE-mail: reshetnyak@ssti.ru  
Department of Mathematics, Seversk State Technological Institute,


Seversk, 636036 , Russia 
 
Quantization procedure in the framework of general superfield quantization
method (GSQM), based on the Lagrangian [1] and Hamiltonian
[2] formulations for general superfield theory of fields,
for irreducible  gauge theories in Lagrangian formalism
is proposed.

Extension procedure for supermanifold  of
superfields , ghost number construction are
considered. Classical and -deformed
 generating (master) equations,
existence theorems for their solutions are formulated in
, .
Analogous scheme is
realized for BV similar generating equations. Master equations versions
for GSQM and BV similar scheme are deformed in powers
of superfields  =
,
 into supermanifold
. Arbitrariness in a choice of
solutions for these equations is described.

Investigation of formal Hamiltonian systems for  II class theories
[2] defined via corresponding   master equations solutions is
conducted. Gauge fixing for those theories is described by two ways.

Functional integral of superfunctions on 
 is defined. Properties for  generating functionals of
Green's  superfunctions are studied.

-component  quantization formulation, connection with BV method and
superfield quantization [3] are established. Quantization scheme realization
is demonstrated on  6 models.
PACS codes: 03.50.-z, 11.10.Ef, 11.15.-q, 12.90.+b 

Keywords: Lagrangian superfield quantization, Gauge theory,
Superfields. 


Introduction 

Lagrangian and Hamiltonian formulations for general superfield theory of
fields (GSTF) formulated in papers [1,2]
directly appear by the basis for creation of GSQM rules  for
gauge theories in Lagrangian (in the usual sense) formalism
generalizing in a natural way the rules for BV quantization method [4] in the
superfield form. In this case a procedure for GSQM is realized
for irreducible superfield (on ) gauge model in the Hamiltonian (or
not always equivalently in Lagrangian) formulation for GSTF. The last as it
had been noticed in [2] contains the all information, among them, on an usual
(relativistic) field theory model. Not repeating the motivations for creation
of GSTF and GSQM stated in detail in [1] let us point out that by the paper's
aim is the construction of complete and noncontradictory rules for GSQM
in the Lagrangian formalism in the framework of GSTF.

In Sec.II having partially preparatory nature it is considered an algorithm,
connected with gauge invariance, of  extension of the supermanifold
 and superalgebras defined on  including
operatorial ones.

Group-theoretic construction of the ghost number concept is
realized in Sec.III. Sec.IV is devoted to formulation  of a GSQM generating
equation  in a minimal sector  together
with its consequences. In the next section the analogous problems are solved
in an
extended sector of supervariables  together
with analysis of possible representations for master equations induced by
transformations of the operators from superalgebras
  and  . Quantum master
equation as a deformation
of GSQM classical master equation  in 
in powers of  is formulated  in Sec.VI. Here it is
considered its properties and another BV similar quantum (in the sense of
deformation on ) master equation and its consequences as well.

In Sec.VII  a so-called global nontrivial arbitrariness in a
choice of solutions of above-mentioned variants for master equations  is
defined.

The deformation procedure in powers of superfields
  for quantum master equations from
Sec.VI with superfunction
 and
derivation of their consequences are fulfilled in Sec.VIII.
The concept of a trivial global arbitrariness in a choice of
solutions of master equations in 
is introduced here as well.

The problem of gauge fixing associated with a choice of the
required Lagrangian
surface in ,
a restriction of the master equation solution  on which possesses by
nondegenerate supermatrix of the 2nd partial superfield derivatives with
respect to superfields parametrizing this surface, is carefully considered
in Sec.IX by means of arbitrariness operation in solutions and phase
anticanonical transformation. The same procedure is solved for GSTF model
satisfying both to  GSQM and  BV similar master equations in
.

By one of the most main objects of the paper it appears the functional
integral of superfunctions whose definition and properties  are
examined in Sec.X. All generating
functionals (superfunctions) of Green's (super)functions

,

 and
effective action 


being intensively used in the quantum  gauge fields theory are introduced.
Properties of these superfunctions including Ward identities are established.

Component (on ) formulation for GSQM rules   is proposed
in Sec.XI. The interconnection of GSQM with BV method [4] and superfield
Lagrangian quantization of the work [3] is entirely discovered in
Sec.XII.

The application of general scheme of GSQM rules
is demonstrated in Sec.XIII on 6
GSTF models  considered for the first time in Refs.[1,2] in the
framework of Lagrangian and Hamiltonian formulations for GSTF. These examples
describe free and interacting massive complex spinless scalar superfields,
massive spinor superfields of spin  and free massless and massive
vector superfields for arbitrary
 and represent the basic field-theoretic models for
construction, for instance, interacting superfield (on ) (non-)Abelian
Yang-Mills type theories not having the analogs in usual relativistic gauge
fields theories on a basis of the gauge principle [5] realization.

At last, in conclusion it is summarized to the definite results of the
work. The all assumptions in the framework of which the paper is made in
fact had been pointed out in the introduction of Ref.[1].

In paper it is used unless otherwise stated the system of notations
suggested in work [1]. In particular  all derivatives  including
superfield variational, partial superfield and component variational (in the
usual sense) with respect to superantifields ,
 and their components are
understood as left  and corresponding ones with
respect to superfields , 
 and their components as right according to failure to mention.
In opposite case  the signs  for the latter derivatives and  for
former ones (for instance,
, 
)
are added.

Extension of  Induced by  Gauge Invariance 

By the principal problem in
quantum theory of gauge fields one appears the construction of the generating
functional of Green's functions for gauge theory of general type (GThGT) or
for one of special type (GThST) in the Lagrangian [1] and Hamiltonian [2]
formulations for GSTF
belonging both to the I class theories and to the II class ones. In
Hamiltonian formalism that theory is defined
by superfunction  belonging to
,  being by
superalgebra of -times differentiable superfunctions given on the extended
by coordinate  supermanifold 
 with coordinates
=
,  (
)
appearing by classical superfields, superantifields and odd time respectively
with following values of the Grassmann parities 
  =  +
 [1,2]








 are the
elements of Berezin superalgebra
,  =
( or ) defined on
superalgebra  [1,2].
Both superalgebras consist of elements being transformed with respect to
superfield (ir)reducible representations of supergroup 
with one-parametric supergroup  corresponding to nilpotent variable
.
The superfield representation  of
supergroup  is given on the superalgebra 
 [1,2]. In its turn elements from
,
 appear by
superfunctions on  parametrized
by coordinates , , where 
 may be by usual quotient space of supergroup  over its
subsupergroup  being by a some set
of the internal automorphisms for  [1].

As it had been shown in [1]
one can choose, in particular case,   in the form of Poincare
supergroup acting on the superspace
 
where  is the dimension of Minkowski space,

is the number of supersymmetries,  and  denote the
Lorentz vector and spinor coordinates on . In the writing
 the signs ,  and
1 denote the number of even with respect to ,
 gradings, odd () with respect to ,
 gradings generating elements  and odd with respect to
,  generating element  [1].

The fact of belonging of a GThGT (GThST) with 
to the I class theories  [2] means a possibility of fulfilment for this model,
defined in Hamiltonian formulation of GSTF, of the following equation
(on solutions   for Hamiltonian systems
(HS) of corresponding different types) written with help of antibracket [2]
 
Belonging of a superfield (on ) model to the II class theories means
the necessary fulfilment of Eq.(2.2) in the whole 
 for any configuration .
Moreover, the superfunction  does not
explicitly depend upon  in the last case.

Generalized Hamiltonian system (GHS) describing dynamics in 
 at least
for the I class theories contains the so-called generalized constraints in
Hamiltonian formalism (GCHF) 
in addition to one's own HS [2]. GCHF restrict possible solutions of HS
subsystem in GHS. In realizing of the condition
 
GCHF appear by holonomic constraints in Hamiltonian formalism (HCHF) [2]. In
the Lagrangian formalism the role being analogous to GCHF (HCHF) plays the
differential constraints in Lagrangian formalism (DCLF)
(holonomic constraints in Lagrangian formalism
(HCLF) being singled out by the relation in brackets) [1]










DCLF above are
expressed through constraints in Hamiltonian formalism via
Legendre transform of superfunction 

   with respect
to odd velocities  under
assumption of invertibility for supermatrix of the 2nd partial superfield
derivatives of  with respect to superfields
 [2].   From basic
theorems of papers [1,2] analyzing the problems of functional
independence of DCLF (HCLF) and GCHF (HCHF) it follows, that among them the
identities may exist  whose number  is equal to 
.

It is the presence of above identities serves in general by obstacle to
construct the generating functional of Green's functions in the Lagrangian
formalism (in the usual sense) without violation of locality and covariance
with
respect to indices of representation  restriction  onto subsupergroup
: .

In order to pass over the above obstacle it is necessary to extend the
supermanifold  of superfields 
and therefore  by additional supervariables, for
instance, by analogy with BV method [4].
The latter means that GThGT (GThST) in Hamiltonian formulation for GSTF
belonging to the I class with superfunction 
restricted from  to 
must be continued  to superfunction 
defined on the type  supermanifold  with
additional coordinates and belonging already at least for  to the II
class GThGT.

Thus, by the central feature of the quantization procedure itself
are a generating equation of the form (2.2) for arbitrary configuration of
the superfields (coordinates) of extended supermanifold (for ) being
considered for . In
correspondence with Statement 5.4 from Ref.[2]  the corresponding
HS is built with respect to the solution  of the last
equation, so that  is its integral.  In this
case  must satisfy according to Statement 5.3 [2]
to condition to be "proper". It means the rank value for supermatrix of the
2nd partial superfield derivatives of  with respect to
coordinates of  type supermanifold calculated
on the special supersurface
is equal to half of the above supermanifold special dimension. As a
result the problem announced in beginning of the section may
be practically decided with use of  in the extended
space.

Not opening of explicit geometric matter of the extension procedure for 
 and  (in fact using the  smooth
vector bundles theory on the basis of supermathematics) let us present the
functional-differential way for continuation of 
 being based on a certain interpretation of
gauge transformations of general  type (GTGT)  and ones of special
type (GTST) in Lagrangian and Hamiltonian formulations for GSTF [1,2]. These
transformations  defined in corresponding
supermanifolds in infinitesimal form [1,2] are given by the formulae
 
with arbitrary superfunctions
, , 
.

 
The generators of GTGT (GGTGT)

 in Lagrangian
and
GGTGT 
in Hamiltonian formulations for GSTF have local on
 representation in fact connecting them with GGTST
  and
 by means of the
relations [1,2]
 
Let us remind that GGTST in (2.5), (2.7) one can consider by coinciding just
as ,
 after substitution into
formers the superfields 
expressed through ,  as a result of transition from
Lagrangian
formulation for GSTF to Hamiltonian one [2] (at least 
 and ,
 and
 are connected by
corresponding equivalence
transformations after their expression in a some definite formulation for
GSTF).

Grassmann parities for GGTGT, GGTST, superfields ,
,  (being auxiliary Lagrange
multipliers for GCHF) are defined by means of the table
 
GTGT (2.4), (2.6) are  the transformations of invariance for superfunctionals
respectively
 
whereas the only superfunction  from
Corollary 2.2 of the Theorem 2 from Ref.[1] in Lagrangian formulation
for GSTF (equivalently from Corollary 1.2 of  the Theorem 1 from Ref.[2]
in Hamiltonian one) is invariant with respect to GTST (2.5), (2.7).
 appears by the potential term in the almost
natural system determined in both formulations by superfunctions
 and  respectively
 
The invariance of the superfunctionals (2.11), (2.12) and
  with respect to GTGT (2.4), (2.6) and GTST
(2.5) or (2.7) respectively is expressed in the presence of the
corresponding identities
 
At last, it should be noted that  sets of generators
,
,
  are complete and
functionally (for 
  linearly) independent correspondingly [1,2].

Further interpretation of GTST (2.5), (2.7) consists in
change in the indicated formulae of arbitrary superfields 
   onto
new arbitrary superfunctions being by a  standard set of ghost
superfields  
 by the formal rule
 

Grassmann gradings for  and their derivatives
 are determined from ones for
 (2.10) and 
(
)
 
Represent the variations of superfields 
in (2.5), (2.7) in the form of differentials formally
having written to this end in these formulae instead of arbitrary superfields
 the differentials of
arbitrary ones    
.
For instance, for (2.7) we have
 
In its turn, express the differentials 
themselves according to formula (2.16) in the form
 
It follows from (2.18), (2.19) that variations of 
(2.5), (2.7) may be represented as the 1st order
system of differential equations with respect to derivatives on  in
the normal form respectively
 

The  transformation for the GTGT (2.4), (2.6) being analogous to the above
procedure for GTST realized in (2.16), (2.18)-(2.21) is impossible without
principal change of the initial supergroup , superspace ,
superalgebras  ,
 structure by means of
the extension of subsupergroup , subsuperspace  to
corresponding two-parametric sets with help of additional to
 Grassmann coordinate  (). Leaving
the exact algorithm construction  for the interpretation of GTGT (2.4),
(2.6) out the paper's scope I only note that in  formulae (2.4), (2.6) it is
necessary to change the all superfields

 onto ones depending upon two-dimensional odd time
:  
.

Relationship (2.16)  realizes in the formula form a projection on the 1st
argument  of the following mapping image
 
in which
the new arbitrary superfunctions being by standard sets of antighost
  and auxiliary
 superfields (,
  
) [4] are associated to arbitrary superfields   in
addition to . The table of Grassmann parities for
additional superfields and their derivatives
,
 is written down in the form
 
Let us designate the joint sets composed from superfields 
, , 
,  for coinciding continual components of
indices   through composite superfields correspondingly
 
[1]symbol  in (2.24) denotes a number of discrete indices
entering in condensed index  in contrast to  the sign  in (2.1)
denoting the integer part of number  Composite
superfields 
 parametrize the sets (in changing
of ,  according to (2.16),
(2.22) the superfields  are changed as well) having the
complicated geometric-differential structure (in what follows formally,
without explicit definitions and descriptions being called, in general, by
supermanifolds(!))
and being designated correspondingly
 
where  are the sets parametrized
by , ,
 respectively.

The Grassmann gradings of the composite superfields (2.24) according to
(2.17), (2.23) are defined by the formulae
 
The derivatives on  of  superfields (2.24)
,
,
,

possess by shifted (on 1) ,  gradings.

Just as  [1]  the supermanifolds ,
 are formally introduced, parametrized by pairs of
superfields (, 
) respectively. As a consequence of
 construction above the following supermanifolds are
defined as well
 
parametrized by coordinates

, ,
, 
,
,
,
, 
,
, 
 respectively. By analogy with
juxtaposition to any  of 
 let us associate with any superfield from
 the following superantifields
 
Let us formally define the supermanifolds , 
 by the relationships
 
Objects , ,
, ,
 are formally determined from relations
(2.29) analogously to (2.27) with corresponding parametrization.

At last, one can define the supermanifolds of the form
 
parametrized by superfields
, 
, ,
,
 = , , , , ,
, ,  for  being by the
corresponding element from ordered set  in (2.30). Introduce on
 the local coordinates which ignore the
superfield-superantifield structure
 
Sets of the pairs

 appear by the coordinates on
 according to (2.31).  Because the
superfields 
  are transformed
with respect to supergroup   superfield representation  
 
[1,2] then taking into consideration that superfields 
() are the elements of a some superfield
representation  space of  supergroup   as well, the
formulae (2.16), (2.19), (2.22) in fact mean the superfields
, , 
are transformed with respect to the same representation 
and their superantifields  with respect to
conjugate one  (as  and  in Ref.[2]).
Therefore the transformation laws for
,
 are known
too.

Gradings    for
superantifields ,  read as follows
according to (2.26)
 
For 
the  grading is the same as in (2.32) for 
 but  and  ones are
shifted on 1.  Besides it is convenient to introduce the Grassmann parities
values for  , 
 considered as the whole superfields
 
Eqs.(2.20), (2.21) in terms of new geometric objects
are the ordinary differential equations (ODE) of the 1st order on  in
.

 
The variations of arbitrary superfunctions
 
, 
,  

    , 

with respect to GTGT (2.4) and
 
 
 with respect to GTST (2.5),
(2.7) may be represented by means of the formulae respectively
 
Under correspondences being given by (2.16), (2.19) for the above indicated
arbitrary superfunctions ,  not explicitly
depending upon   the only variations (2.34b) for GTST can be
represented almost equivalently
in the form of translation along  coordinate on a parameter 
  induced by variation of
superfields  (or
equivalently onto solutions  for corresponding
Eqs.(2.20), (2.21))
 
Formula (2.35) is suitable in equal form
for both variations (2.34b). The absence in the right-hand side of
variations (2.35), in view of nilpotent operator 
 presence, the projector  from the system of projectors
,  acting in 
[1,2]
is possible only in realizing of the
solvability conditions for systems (2.20), (2.21) according to the
Statement 3.6 from Ref.[2], which (i.e. solvability conditions) for the above
systems are not in general fulfilled.
The accounting of explicit dependence upon  for 
under interpretation of its variation (2.34b) by means of the type (2.35)
formula is
possible only  with help of the above additional variable 
introduction. Remind  that
concept of solvability for ODE of the 0,1,2 orders with respect to
 [1,2] means the fulfilment on  solutions of corresponding system
of all its  differential consequences being obtained by differentiation on
 of this system.
The last remarks mean a notion of
"almost equivalence" for formulae (2.34b), (2.35).

Let us continue the process of extension of algebraic structures earlier
given on , , 
and etc. [1,2] onto corresponding  geometric objects built on a basis of
, . Superalgebras

, ,
,

, ,
,

, 
,  [1,2]
are successively continued to the corresponding sets of
superfunctions under formal change of  index  on arbitrary element
 (2.30).
Here under ,  and  we understand
respectively the
superalgebras over number field  of superfunctions being by finite
polynomials on expanding in series in powers of  generating
elements-coordinates on , 
,  i.e. superfields 
, ,
by formal power series
() and by superalgebra ,  with
partial superfield differentiation of its elements for which the
expansions in Taylor's series are valid [1,2]. The last superalgebra
consists of -times differentiable superfunctions. In addition it is
naturally to regard that with respect to part of generating elements, for
instance,  and  the
superalgebra , 
 consists of superfunctions being considered as (finite) power series
with respect to indicated variables.
For example, for 
  
    the representation in the
form of series with respect to  and (or) 
, to be finite for polynomials
corresponding in the such case for local superfunctions relatively
to 
and (or) , is valid
according to Ref.[1] with notations being analogous to ones suggested in
[1,2]
 

 
Series coefficients 
 and 
possess by  the following symmetry properties written, for instance, for the
latters
 
For 

,  we assume
the expansion in formal functional Taylor's series in powers of
=  ,
=
 
 in a some neighbourhood
(possibly in the whole  of a point
, 
   being valid. Moreover we presuppose the
 is equipped by  structure of a
norm and a convergence of the series with respect to that norm
 
with decomposition coefficients satisfying to the properties (2.38). It is not
complicated to write down the analogs of formulae (2.36), (2.39) for any
  
 and   ,  respectively.
It is sufficient in this case to change  in the above-mentioned formulae
the superfields , 

onto  and
,  respectively.

An action of projector systems
,  and , ,
 ( = ,  defined in [1,2]
are naturally continued from  to , 
with following from this fact  all consequences for
representation of . Besides, the special involution  [1,2] is
naturally continued onto  
 and ,  as well so that

 and subsuperalgebra  = 
 parametrized by -components of
superfields ,
, i.e. by
,
, are
invariant with respect to action of involution .

The classes of regular over  superfunctionals   and
 are continued to ones
 and   consisting of the continued
superfunctionals defined
on    and 
   correspondingly by means of the formulae
 
The formulae of the variational calculus [1,2] are valid
for these superfunctionals under
formal change of 
onto  and 
 onto .

For an arbitrary superfunction from  it is not difficult to
produce the transformation laws under action  of the superfield
representation ,  operators constructed with respect to ,
, , .

At last, the superalgebra of the 1st order differential operators (with
respect to differentiation on 
  over 
[1] and one of the 1st and 2nd orders operators
  over  
 and  [2]
 in a natural and literal way
are continued to   and  
acting on  and
, , 
respectively with help of continued projector system  and
involution . Let us indicate the corresponding formulae for the basis
elements ,  from
  and
, ,
, ,
, ,
,  from  , 

 
Grassmann gradings  for
operators , , 
 are equal to (0,0,0), whereas for
,
,
,  to
(1,0,1) respectively.

Involution  acting on   
 by the rule
 
transfers the superfield 
into -conjugate one  being
transformed with respect to supergroup  -conjugate representation if
 are transformed on 
representation. By means of (2.41), (2.42) one can write down the other
elements of   and   as well
in the almost superfield form
 
In writing of (2.43), (2.44) it is taken into consideration according to
[1,2] that by relationship
 
involution  is continued onto  , .

All algebraic
properties for operators from  , 
  and conclusions of the papers [1,2]
without changes are transferred onto  , 
 . The  operators  action on the
product
of any superfunctions ,   yields the
following antibrackets , , =
 
In its turn  the operators (2.44) action on the such product generates the other
antibrackets in the superfield form (, ,
. For example, for  we have
 
All antibrackets satisfy to the standard properties for odd Poisson bracket
[2], i.e. to an generalized antisymmetry, Leibnitz rule, Jacobi identity.
In addition
their , ,  gradings are
identical to ones for antibrackets given on  [2] and, for instance,
for  reads as follows
 
For any operator   
,
,
, 
and for  the relationship holds
 
The so-called transformations of operators from   [2]
are continued onto  , .
Let us confine ourselves by the case of operators  defined
before (2.49) having required of the following transformation rule
fulfilment
 
The condition of nilpotency preservation  for  leads to
equation on     of the form
 
In particular the restriction of 
 onto   vanishes.
Transformation (2.50) permits to obtain the vanishing for one from
, at least for
 or
,
with help of a choice for  (see Ref.[2] for details).

Ghost Number 

In order to single out the definite subsets in  and then in
 it is convenient to introduce a special group structure.

By group  of homogeneous in the extended sense (scaled or ghost)
transformations of the superspace  let us call the one-parametric
group
of linear transformations of  defined by its action on coordinates

 
The weights of  and  (being usually called by the ghost
numbers) are equal respectively
 
Formally defining the elements  and  on dual to 

(being by tangent space over point 
with basis , )
cotangent space  we put
 
[2]for such definition of ghost number the sign of integral with
respect to variable  () must formally possess by ghost
number to be equal to  Representation  of the group  in

 
is realized by means of relations on its coordinates
 
Representation  induces in fibres over point with coordinates 
: ,
 ,
(we
assume ,
, 
are the bundles over base
 (without presentation of their explicit construction)) 
correspondingly the representations
 
being realized on the coordinates of these supermanifolds by the formulae
 
It should be noted the
nontrivial () value of ghost number on , ,
etc. is connected with nontrivial    grading
().

Composing the linear span of all possible tensor products of elements from
, , ,

one can obtain the group  representation  realization,
connected with representation   (3.4), on the superalgebra , 

 
Representation  on the coordinates of elements from 
considered as the superalgebra acts by the rule taking formulae (3.5),
(3.7)-(3.9) into account
 
so that
 

According to definition, by homogeneous superfunction  in
the extended sense
(superfunctional ) on  () of degree
 call the superfunction

, 
 
  satisfying to equation on value of 
 
For arbitrary homogeneous superfunction in the extended sense 
 with definite   the Euler's
theorem holds
 
where the linear operator  (ghost number operator) is defined by the
formula
 
All elements of superalgebra 
  with  and antibrackets (2.46), (2.47)
shift the ghost number values of homogeneous
with respect to "" components of superfunctions from , on
which the mentioned objects act, on 
 
Let us formally ascribe to  all such operators from 
 
and to antibrackets  the ghost number being equal to 1
 
whereas to other ones with  the zero ghost number.
The requirement of the ghost number conservation  in transforming of the
operators
 (2.50) leads to the following additional restriction on the
structure of superfunction  and therefore on
,  in (2.51)
 
Classical Master Equation in  Minimal Sector 

The restriction of
superfunction  
) [2] with corresponding GHS

 
determining the I class GThGT  in Hamiltonian formalism for GSTF by means
of requirements that  would not
explicitly depend upon  and would appear by eigenfunction for
ghost number operator  (3.15) with zero ghost number,
is defined by the equations
 
according to (3.2), (3.5), (3.8). The nonvanishing of superfunction
 will be guaranteed by condition of potential
term existence for  of the form
(2.14). Really the following expressions are valid
 
where the integer-valued functions of degree 
,
 (2.3),

and of least degree , 
, ,
, 
had been defined in Ref.[1] for arbitrary superfunction with respect
to any generating element .

Restricted GHS
corresponding to   arises from (4.1) already
with HCHF 
 
The  equivalence of GHS (4.1) to one's own HS subsystem (4.1a) by virtue of
Statement 3.3 from Ref.[2] is lost for the case of GHS (4.5) in spite of the
restricted dynamical equations presence [2]
 
That restricted by means of Eqs.(4.3) superfield theory with superfunction
  determines the II class GThST on 
, i.e.  appears by not
only integral for HS (4.5a) but satisfies to Eq.(2.2) for any
 as well. It means [2] both GHS
(4.5) and HS (4.5a) are solvable. The supermatrix rank
of the 2nd partial superfield derivatives with respect to
,  of superfunction
 by virtue of initial postulate
, written in Ref.[2], on the structure of 
 is equal on a stationary surface  to , where  is
the number of identities among

 
In addition to Eq.(2.2), its consequence is trivially fulfilled  in the
whole  (Statement 5.5 of work [2])
 
For obtained GThST of the II class by virtue of corollary 2.2 for Theorem 2
in Ref.[1] and corollary 1.2 for Theorem 1 in [2] the identities, following
from the 3rd group equations in (2.15) with allowance made for algebraic
properties for projectors  applied for
decomposition of mentioned equations, are valid
 
in identifying of 
 .
GTST presented in the form of n ODE system (2.21) can be written as
follows
 
The extension  of n ODE system (4.10a) to the 1st order on 
2n ODE system in the normal form with respect to derivatives 
 reads as follows
 
In (4.11) the dependence upon superfields  is parametric
one. System (4.11) itself does not satisfy to solvability condition.
The supermatrix rank of the 2nd partial superfield derivatives with respect to
,  of 
calculated in  for linearly
independent GGTST 
is equal (with respect to  grading) on the supersurface 
 

 
A distribution of rank values for supermatrix of the form (4.7), (4.12) with
respect to enumeration of the columns and rows on parities
 and  is differred in accordance with
whether the parities of
indices for supermatrix elements coincide with parities of corresponding
generating elements or are opposite to them. So, the rank values (4.7) are
identical for  and   by virtue of
,  gradings but for
expression (4.12) are distinct with respect to change of boson and fermion
values for rank of supermatrix (4.12). It is natural to denote the ranks with
respect to the mentioned gradings by additional sign ,
: , 
.
In this case, the rank with respect to 
() have been written in (4.12) and for the case of
  the value  must
stand in the right-hand side of formula (4.12).

In view  of ,
,  gradings specification for the first
time introduced in [1] that principal difference had been earlier ignored.
For instance, in Refs.[4,6,7] where for fields and
antifields the only  grading  in fact was introduced,
the corresponding rank had been calculated, under omission, with respect to
 one!

Note the dimensions of  with respect to
,   gradings over number field
 are equal to
 
whereas the  dimensions of ,
 with respect to the same parities are differred
 
from where it is seen that the structures of the even (odd) subsupermanifolds
on  and  parities  are different. In what
follows we will work in GSQM mathematical means, in general, with notion of
 and  by omitting
under rank notion  it will be understood namely the last type of rank for
even supermatrix just as in calculating of  the  geometric
objects dimensions we use the operation . For instance,
the dimensions of superspaces , ,
,  are given by the following
table
 
It is easy to find from (4.14), (4.15) the corresponding
dimensions of the other geometric structures , 
, , ,
 (2.30).
These concepts for dimensions and ranks should be transferred onto
corresponding objects in Refs.[1,2]. From the notations in (4.13), (4.15b)
it is
easy to obtain 
and 
being respectively by designations  for even and
odd dimensions of the sets in (4.14), (4.15) with respect to
 parity.

Next, for construction  the II class GThGT  let us combine the systems
(4.5), (4.11) by means of addition of the corresponding vector fields
components  standing from the right in Eqs.(4.5a), (4.11). As a result obtain
the following
almost Hamiltonian system  of the 1st order on  2n ODE in normal
form given on 
 
with superfunction  defined by equality
 
Conditions (4.3a,b) are obviously fulfilled for superfunction

 
At last extend the system (4.16) to HS of the form
 
Theory of superfields  being described by
superfunction  leads to HS (4.19) not satisfying
to solvability condition for GThGT [not forgetting on presence of HCHF
(4.5b) and formally having  continued the relation (4.6) into
:  =



we already obtain the GCHF and therefore from initial GThST the
GThGT ,
so that  =
]. The unsolvability for Eq.(4.19)
follows from the
nonfulfilment of Eq.(2.2) for  in the whole
 (see Statement 5.4 in [2])
 
Thus the equation
 
is valid only with accuracy up to the 1st degree with respect to
superfields . Moreover, the necessary condition of an
ordinary solvability for Eq.(4.21) in correspondence with Statement 5.3 [2]
holds.
Really, the rank () of Hesse supermatrix according
to assumptions , , Corollary 1.2 from Ref.[2] and
taking (4.7), (4.12) into account is given by relations
 
This fact is seen especially simple in the point from 
 with coordinates
 
in which supermatrix (4.22a) has the form
 
Under sign "" in the above supermatrices it should be
understood  the zero values. The signs of ,

point out the  enumeration of the columns and rows for these supermatrices.

 appears by
nondegenerate supermatrix with value for its rank with respect to 
 
being equal to   by virtue of linear
independence of  and
identities (4.9). At last the subsupermatrices ,
,  appear by linear combinations of
the  corresponding rows and columns of the nondegenerate supermatrix
 and therefore do not give a nonvanishing
contribution into rank value of supermatrix (4.24).

To fulfill the Eq.(4.21) together with
condition (4.22) it is necessary to modify  by means
of special superfunction  to be now quadratic
with respect to . Moreover the modified Eq.(4.21)
for superfunction
 
in general case having the form
 
will be satisfied with accuracy up to . Naturally in
(4.26b) it is taken into account the continuation of the ghost number and
Grassmann gradings
properties from  onto 
 

It does not arise from (4.27), in general, but from the construction of
 itself with respect to right-hand side of Eq.(4.20a) it
follows that  may be chosen in the form not explicitly
depending upon .
Thus, conditions (4.27) determine  as more than quadratic
addition  to , and therefore  does not
influence on value of rank (4.22) written for  in its
calculating on the supersurface

 in view of the
expression
 
One can construct the HS with respect to  (4.25) being by
deformation for HS (4.19) in powers of  having replaced
to this end the  on  in the last equations.
Obtained HS will not be solvable again by virtue of the fact that
  in (4.26a).

The deformation process of  in powers of
 by means  of special superfunction 
addition, constructed with respect to  in order
to the superfunction  =  +  would
satisfy to Eq.(4.26a) with accuracy up to   and so on
may be continued in the framework, for instance, of
polynomial theory (i.e. , 
 are the polynomials on  with
respect to  and on a definite stage of
 construction  will be broken  satisfying to
Eq.(4.26a) for   in all powers of .
Thus, the procedure of superfunction  deformation in
superfield form  by components of higher powers of
 in order to satisfy to Eq.(4.20a) and
therefore, in agreement with Statement 5.4 from paper [2], to solvability
of corresponding HS of the type (4.19) is described.

The construction of superfunction , 
taking values in 
 
satisfying to the equation (usually called the master equation or generating
equation of gauge algebra [4,6,7])
 
to the conditions (4.22) without change of the Lagrangian surface,
parametrized by , and
to the following equations for 
 
appears by the result of the produced procedure. Corresponding solvable HS has
the form
 
and possesses by  as  one's integral.
Besides HCHF(4.5b) are the additional conditions to HS (4.32).

The following equation is represented by principal one appearing by virtue of
validity of the Statement 5.5 from Ref.[2] for the II class GThGT, being
described by , by  the consequence of the Eq.(4.30)
 
Briefly the algorithm of construction of the II class GThGT given  on
, being defined by
superfunction , starting from
the I class original GThGT  given on  with
, in general, not appearing by integral for
HS determined with respect to the latter superfunction
(therefore being unsolvable), may describe in the form
of following operations sequence realization:

1)  The restriction by means of ghost number and operator 
 of the I class  original GThGT
determined on     with
 to the II class GThST  given
on  with
superfunction   
 (with additional HCHF ).
This stage is described by relations (4.1)-(4.5);

2)  Join of HS for the II class GThST  with 
 and system of the 1st order on 
 n ODE  in  the normal form, describing GTST for
  in
   and obtaining the
superfunction   
 .
That step is described by the formulae (4.10a)-(4.12), (4.16)-(4.18);

3)  The extension of the almost HS from the 2nd stage  to HS in

defined by means of  and obtaining of GThGT but not yet of
the II class. The set of formulae (4.19)-(4.24) corresponds to this step;

4)  Deformation of  in powers of 
with obtaining of  determining
the II class GThGT. The mathematical description starting from formula (4.25)
to Eq.(4.33) inclusively corresponds to that stage.

Definite moments of  construction beginning from
, in particular the possibility of
 construction with respect to the right-hand side of
the preceding equation for 
 for the th degree on , require the
demonstrative verification.

Therefore formulate the obtained results in the form of theorem (without its
proof here)

Theorem 1  (Existence of a solution for the classical
master equation in )

A solution for equation (4.30) in fulfilling of the conditions (4.31),
boundary condition
 
b) an existence of the Lagrangian surface   
 parametrized by coordinates
 (
 = ,  = ,  =
) so that  on the supersurface  

 the
formula holds
 
and   
( is defined in (4.23)), in class of
superfunctions   
 with representation (4.29) exists.


Having realized the 1st step of the procedure for constructing of the II
class GThGT, connected with transition from 
to , for  the obtained II class GThST
with HCHF (4.5b) the identities (4.9)  are written equivalently
in terms of vector fields  over 
 with basis 
  in the form
 
The supercommutator of two arbitrary operators ,
 naturally defined in the linear space of
vector fields must vanish in calculating on 
 just as for  themselves
 
The last fact by virtue of completeness for the set of GGTST

means that the coordinates of the vector field 

have the following general form
 
with superfunctions ,
  
  possessing by vanishing ghost numbers values and following
, ,  parities and
symmetry properties as well
) 
Relationships (4.36), (4.38) partially define the gauge algebra of GTST with
its generators .
The comparison of (4.38) with the form of  in (4.20a)
permits to transform  and then to obtain the explicit
form for 
 
Thus   
 is not only by affine -module but
appears
by a special form superalgebra with respect to supercommutator .
Classical Master Equation in  

In principle, superfunction  is already suitable to
construct the generating functional of Green's functions in view of the
properness (4.35) for solution of Eq.(4.30) in the terminology of works
[4,6,7].
As it have been already  mentioned it is usually impossible to do the such
step in the Lagrangian quantization procedure
without violation of locality and irreducibility with respect to indices of
 representation.

Let us extend  from
value of  to  in a such way that the latter superfunction
leads to the II class GThGT in .
By boundary condition for that extension it appears the following restriction
for   
 
All other properties of  either are literally
inherited by  or are specially modified.

Theorem 2  (Existence of a solution for the classical master
equation in )

A solution of the equation
 
under validity of the system
 
and in fulfilling of the additional conditions
 
b) an  existence of the Lagrangian surface 

parametrized by coordinates , 
() so that on the supersurface  
  
 the relations hold
 
( is given in (4.23)) in class of
superfunctions
  , 
with representation
 
exists.

Remarks: 

1)  Solutions  , 
in (4.30),  (5.2) are not uniquely determined in the framework of the
conditions for Theorems 1,2;

2)  Lagrangian  surfaces ,  are not uniquely
defined by means of conditions of the above Theorems as well. Fixing of the
quadratic parts for superfunctions  =
 + ,
 determines ,
,  to be essentially  unique in that sense for ,

corresponding to ,  that
under conditions of the Theorems 1,2 the coordinates
, 
parametrizing ,   respectively
are  connected by the relationships
 
Coordinates
  on
, , 
appear by anticanonically conjugate  pairs. Grassmann parities, ghost numbers
for , ,

can be chosen by coinciding for fixed . Thus, fixing of the explicit
form for ,
 determines
 in the essentially unique way;

3)  in fixing of  in series (5.7) by the conditions
of Theorem 1 and under inclusion     
it is possible to represent the Lagrangian surface   in the
form
 
where  is defined by means of quadratic part of 
 with respect to ;

4)  to solve the problem on covariant construction of the generating
functional of Green's functions starting from the II class GThGT  being
defined by 
it is sufficient, in general, to deform the superfunction

to  given on
. In
this connection  it is necessary to write in Theorem 2 the values
,
 =  instead of values , 
and the value of rank in (5.5) must be given by the following supernumber
 
In fact the superfunction
 
satisfies to Theorem 2 in this case.


In the framework of the remark 3) the equation (5.2) with allowance made for
validity of (4.30) leads to fulfilment of the following one
 
By its particular solution it appears, for instance, the superfunction
 
Thus, the superfunction  
 
satisfies both to the requirements of Theorem 2 with 
 = ,
 and to conditions (5.9).
Part of  being invariant with
respect to involution  and therefore
having the form 
appears by none other than the Batalin-Vilkovisky action
 given for irreducible gauge theories for  [4,7]
 
It appears by important  the remark about way of representation for
Eqs.(4.30), (5.2) if to make use the transformation of operators
, 
 by means of relationships (2.50), (2.51). Namely having chosen
 
we obtain in substituting of (5.16) into (5.2), for fixed  in (5.16a),
the equations on ,
   in
more difficult for investigation forms
 
At last, note that  in the framework of the Theorem 2
conditions  determines HS (4.32)  and equation of the form
(4.33) for . The last equation is valid in this
case being by consequence for Eq.(5.2) (for ). The latter
conclusion appears by important distinction of GSQM from BV method [4,6]
where Eq.(4.33) in general has not taken place.
Quantum Master Equation in  

By following stage in procedure of the  GSQM construction one appears the
deformation of the II class GThGT  defined by  in powers
of  to the II class GThGT  with superfunction
 
Quantum Master Equation for GSQM 

Theorem 3  (Existence of a solution for the quantum master
equation in )

A solution of the equation
 
under validity of the relationships
 
and fulfilment of the additional conditions [a) boundary condition and b) of
necessity for solution to be "proper"]
 
b) an existence of the Lagrangian surface  parametrized by
coordinates  = 
, 
 ,  so that
on the supersurface  the relations are fulfilled for

 
in class of superfunctions  
 exists.


Remarks 1)-4) written after Theorem 2 with corresponding
modifications are also valid for the II class GThGT  with
. In addition one
can require, in a natural way, the fulfilment of the Theorem 3 for ,
 as well. Moreover the following representation holds
 
Coordinates
, 
  are
connected with initial  by means of an anticanonical
transformation. Finally, the corresponding
solvable HS has the form
 
Remark:  Superfunction 
both for  and   does not correspond to a some
equivalent superfunction   

in the Lagrangian formulation for GSTF because of impossibility to realize
the Legendre transform for
 with respect to .
In the framework of the Theorems 2,3 conditions  it leads, in general, to
invalidity of the relationships (4.1b), (4.6) for HS constructed
with respect to .
However as it have been already mentioned the HCHF (4.5b) are inherited by
the continued superfield model.


According to the Statement 5.5 from Ref.[2] the fulfilment of the following
equation appears by the consequence of Eq.(6.2)
 
Theorem 3 for  has as one's corollaries the Theorems 1,2 for
corresponding values of . Eq.(6.2) being iteratively solved in powers of
 is equivalent to the system of equations
 
By necessary and sufficient condition for the existence of a solution for
system
(6.10) appears the resolvability (in the usual sense) of the 1st
equation, i.e. the validity of Theorem 2.
BV Type Quantum Master Equation 

A set of solutions for Eq.(6.2) for 
taking of its consequence (6.9) into account is embedded (but is not
equivalent)
into one of solutions for ordinary (standard [4,6,7]) quantum master equation
 
being equivalently represented in the form of linear differential equation
 
Eq.(6.12), in general, may contain the solutions with summands to be not
less than
linear in powers of  and not satisfying to Eq.(6.2) (in terms of
the equivalent system (6.10) not satisfying to one's own
subsystem with exception of the 1st equation in (6.10)).

One can formulate the analog of Theorem 3 for Eq.(6.12). To this end it is
sufficient to replace formally the Eq.(6.2) onto Eq.(6.12). The similar
analogs one can write for .

In the framework of local field theories the Eq.(6.12) contains with
respect to indices of  supergroup the usual -function and its
derivatives calculated in 0 (, ) so that
a regularization of the such expressions, for instance, in the form
 =  =  (as in the dimensional one)
leads
to the fact that solution for Eq.(6.12) appears by solution for (6.2).

The HS defined with respect to  being by solution
of Eq.(6.12), but not of Eqs.(6.2), (6.9), does
not satisfy to the solvability conditions [1,2]. In particular, in
correspondence with Statement 5.6 [2] it means both the absence, in general
case, of nilpotency for corresponding translation generator along formal
integral curves for that HS  [2] and the fact that
superfunction   does not appear by integral for
mentioned HS and does not vanish under operator  action
defined by following relationship in acting on an arbitrary
  
 
Eqs.(4.30), (5.2), (6.2), their consequences of the form (6.9) and
Eq.(6.11) as well do not depend upon different choices of local coordinates
 connected with each other via anticanonical
transformations in view of antibracket  and operator
 invariance with respect to these transformations.
That fact permits to find the such
coordinates  in which the
superfunctions ,   remaining
invariable on their values will  have the simplest form of dependence
upon .

On the other hand  from nonuniqueness of solutions for Eqs.(6.2),
(6.12) it follows the possibility of  transformation
not directly connected with anticanonical ones
under which these superfunctions are converted into others, depending on the
same local coordinates  just as the initial
 and satisfying to the same equations.
Nontrivial Arbitrariness in Solutions of Master Equations 

By global nontrivial arbitrariness (GNA) in solutions of Eq.(6.12) let us
call the following transformation of corresponding superfunctions

 
with the 2nd order  with respect to
 operator
 defined by relation
 
From the requirement of satisfaction by  to the
conditions of Theorem 3 analog formulated for Eq.(6.12) it follows the
necessary properties for  
 with its representability in the form
of the type (6.1) series in powers of 
 
The 1st order operator 
is given by the explicit expression
 
The fact, that 
satisfies to Eq.(6.12), if  had appeared by the
solution
for the same equation  arises from commutativity of the operator (7.4) and

 
Consider for Eq.(6.2) the GNA in the form (7.1) defined with respect
to superfunction   
 additionally satisfying to equation
 
Then from (7.4) it follows the representation for

 
One can show the formula (7.1) is transformed to the expression
 
From the last relation with allowance made for identity (7.5) applied to the
operator (7.7) it follows that together with (6.12) the equation holds
 
which means in its turn  the fulfilment of Eq.(6.2) for
.

Thus, a subset of GNA transformations for Eq.(6.12) with additional condition
(7.6) on  transfers
a solution for Eq.(6.2) into solution again with conservation of the
consequence (7.9) validity  for new solution.
Quantum Master Equations in  
Quantum Master Equation for GSQM in 
 

Consider according to paper [3] the deformation of the II class GThGT
with superfunction  satisfying to
Eq.(6.2) in powers of superfields
 in order to the validity of
Theorem 3 would remain invariable for deformed superfunction

  , .

Theorem 4:  (Existence of a solution for the
quantum master equation in  )

A solution of the equation
 
under validity of the Eqs.(6.3), a) boundary condition
 
b) an existence of the Lagrangian surface 
 parametrized by coordinates
, 
 , , so
that the condition (6.5) holds on the possibly deformed by superfields
 supersurface 
  together with 
 having the form as in (6.6),
in class of superfunctions

   exists.


Although a dependence upon 
in Eq.(8.1) is parametric one but the properties and interpretation
of the corresponding formal gauge theory appear by essentially different  in
comparison with ones for
  .

The fulfilment of Eq.(8.1) does not guarantee a realizability of Eq.(6.9)
in  for  . This
is related with the fact that Eq.(8.1) itself, antibracket of 2 arbitrary
superfunctions given on  and operator  calculated on
   are not already
invariant with respect to anticanonical transformations. This invariance is
restored only in restricting of  to .
Therefore Eq.(6.9) for  appears by independent
equation with respect to (8.1) and must be considered additionally.

Corresponding system of 2 ODE defined with respect to 
 from Theorem 4 both for  and  has
the form of the 1st order on  system of  ODE
 
not already being in normal form and therefore  loses a number of properties
for solutions of the real HS. Call the system (8.3) by the
HS type system .

Formally the last system by virtue of Eq.(8.1) is solvable but is not
covariant with respect to anticanonical transformations. The generator
  being formally
defined with help of action on arbitrary   
 
is nilpotent and transfers 
into zero.
BV Type Quantum Master Equation  in
 

Analogously to Theorem 4 one can write down the formulation for Existence
Theorem of a solution for equation of the form (6.11) with

   representing the deformation
of superfunction , satisfying to mentioned
equation, in powers of  . To
this end it is sufficient to replace the relation (8.1) in
Theorem 4 onto formula with equation
 
Corresponding HS type system  given in the form (8.3) now is not formally
solvable. Operator 
 (8.4) constructed with respect to  from
Eq.(8.5) is not nilpotent and does not possess by this superfunction (i.e.
) as one's eigenfunction with zero eigenvalue.

By remarkable case it appears the fact that GNA (7.1), with

   satisfying to the conditions (7.3), transfers an any
solution for (8.5) into solution  
 again. Among such transformations there exists a subset with
superfunction    satisfying to (7.6)
so that GNA (7.1) in the form  (7.8) transfers solutions of
Eqs.(8.1), (6.9) for

 in their solutions

 again.

Remark:  HS or HS type system  corresponding to
   or
, 
  ,  satisfying, for instance, to Eqs.(6.1)
or (8.5) respectively are modified under GNA to
HS and HS type system  defined with respect to
,
 from 
, .
Trivial Arbitrariness in  Master Equations Solutions in

  

The structure of supermanifolds ,
 permits to specify the another type of transformations for
solutions of Eqs.(8.1), (8.5) being different from GNA (7.1).

Define the so-called global trivial arbitrariness (GTA) in a choice of
solutions for Eq.(8.5) transferring its solution 
  into corresponding one of the form 
,  
 by the formula
 
In addition the superfunction  must satisfy to the
equation
 
GTA for Eq.(8.1) is described by the same relations (8.6),
(8.7) but without operator  in (8.7a), whereas for the
equation
 
is given by formula (8.6) but instead of relationship (8.7) the following one
must be fulfilled
 
Gauge Fixing 
Gauge Fixing Procedure in  

Theorems 2,3 together with their BV similar analogs permit to present a
parametrization for  in terms of variables
, , containing both
 and .

As it had been already mentioned the explicit construction of
 leads to violation of locality and covariance
relative to indices of  representation.  The
standard problem of   modification, in satisfying of
the Theorems 2,3 conditions,  to   
   arises with
parametrization of  only by
superfields  in changing of local coordinates system
 in a such way that its subsystem consisting
from  remains invariable providing the direct
connection with original superfield classical theory. Resolution of the
problem in question is realized by means of two different ways with respect
to modification of :

1) with help of phase anticanonical transformation (AT) in the class of
Abelian hypergauges;

2) by means of application of GNA operation to solutions of Eqs.(6.2), (6.11)
for .


Theorem 5  (on modification of  to
)

A phase AT exists:  
 = 
 ,  a such that
 satisfying to Eq.(6.2) is transformed
into  satisfying to the same equation.
For  latter superfunction the boundary condition (6.4) is true and the
condition to be "proper" (6.5) is fulfilled both for 
and for  parametrized by 
and  respectively.

Proof  of the Theorem is based in the presentation of mentioned
transformation by the explicit formulae with additional requirement
 of the  and
ghost gradings conservation for new  coordinates in
the same form as for the old  ones
 
The nontrivial condition to be anticanonical for the change of variables (9.1)
follows from the potentiality of the expression
 
in its turn arising from definition of arbitrary AT:
  ,  by means
of the relationships taking account of (2.41d)
 
A local solution of Eqs.(9.2) determines  superfunctions
 through the phase of AT  
 (usually being called by the gauge
fermion for  [4,6])
 
with the choice for arbitrary constants  to be equal to 0
being consistent with restrictions on .

The definition of AT by means of relations (9.3)
implies  the invariance
of the antibracket calculated on any , 
 
 
From formula of  definition  through antibracket [2]
 
it follows the invariance of the form of action for operator 
 on an arbitrary
  
 
where in the 2nd expression  it is taken into account that the operator
 is given through 
according to formula (9.6) and coincides with  being by the
invariant of AT itself.

Having expressed of  through the new
coordinates   obtain the following representation for

 
In (9.8) the notation for any
  
is introduced as follows
 
It follows from (9.8) taking into account of (7.1), (7.8) that
 has the form
 
Relations (9.10) determine the fact that for new superfunction 
 given by the formula (under AT (9.1), (9.8))
 
the representation written on equality of  coordinates 
is true
 
meaning that  is obtained from  by means of GNA
(7.1) with superfunction   
 satisfying among them to Eq.(7.6).
 satisfies both to Eq.(6.2) and to
its consequence (6.9).

A choice of  from the nondegeneracy requirement for
supermatrix of the 2nd derivatives of 
 with respect to   under restriction onto

 
leads to the following necessary conditions on the gauge fermion

 
The contents of the new   and old coordinates
, connected through AT (9.1), for original
 described in Theorem 3 is differred, whereas the ones
of new  and old superfields  under the same
AT parametrizing   
coincide.


It appears a so-called minimal  the choice of gauge fermion for
transition to  in the form
 
which in general permits  to pass to 
 for superfunction  
 for  = . Formula
(9.16) defines the gauge called in BV method for   by
singular whereas the nonsingular one has the representation for 
 
From Theorem 5 proof it follows  that phase AT (9.1) is equivalently given
for  by means of GNA operation (7.1).
The last conclusion is remarkable by the fact that it is sufficient in
 to shift
the argument of superantifields 
on 
to determine  .
It should be noted the restriction of 
 (9.8) onto hypersurface defined by equations 
 leads to the following superfunction
 
being nondegenerate on  and belonging to 
.

Remarks: 

1)  In ignoring of the above-mentioned requirements of covariance and
locality but with preservation of the given Grassmann parities and ghost
numbers
distribution for  superfields, superantifields under AT one can describe
with help of Theorem 5 the all essentially different Lagrangian surfaces on
which the condition b) from Theorems 2,3 is realized, in the sense of their
distinct parametrizations in terms of new coordinates .
The number of such hypersurfaces including ,
 is equal to ;

2)  the investigation of the correspondence of an arbitrary GNA (7.1)
and AT remains out the present paper's scope;

3)  the extension of the application field for Theorem 5 relative to
GThGT,
being described by  satisfying to
Eq.(6.11), is literally realized by replacement of Eq.(6.2) onto (6.11) in
the formulation of that Theorem.

Corollary 5.1  (on HS being defined by
)

HS defined by superfunction  =
,  obtained under AT (9.1)
 
is equivalent to previous one given
by , 
in the old coordinates .

Proof:  Taking into consideration  the antibracket (9.5)
invariance under AT  and Leibnitz rule for antibracket we obtain
 
Quantities   are
transformed under AT by the rule
 
Finally the statement of Corollary  directly follows from nondegeneracy
of Jacobi supermatrix 
 in Eqs.(9.20), (9.21).


The formal change of  onto initial coordinates 
 in (9.19) leads to nonequivalent HS defined with respect to

 
In this case in its subsystem corresponding to
 the only summands in right-hand side
for
 
coincide with corresponding ones in the right-hand side of analogous HS
constructed with respect to initial .
Namely, HS (9.22)(usually instead of expression
 one  writes
 that is achieved by
simple redefinition of   )  plays the key role in
BV method [4].  This HS possesses by solvability property with corresponding
translation generator with respect to  along its integral curve
 
being by nilpotent
and annuling .

However the projection of solution for HS (9.22) on its subsystem
 
with trivial other equations leads to the generator of translation with
respect to  along projection of solution for HS (9.22) onto
system (9.25) of the form
 
not being nilpotent but annuling
. The last generator
 appears for ,  by the
generator of BRST transformations being applied in BV method on
. The restriction of 
 on  by the rule
 
leads to the operator of BRST transformations for  acting on
 with the same properties as for
.
Gauge fixing in  

Theorem 6  (on modification of  to
 for   )

There exist the GNA transformation for 
  ,
 satisfying to Eq.(8.1) (or (8.5)) and transferring 
 to a superfunction 
  ,
(
  )
satisfying to Eq.(8.1) (or (8.5)) as well. Moreover the following conditions
must be realized in question

a) for 
 the boundary conditions
(8.2) remains  valid;

b) condition of properness (point b) in Theorem 4) is fulfilled both for
 and for  parametrized by
,  respectively.


Proof:  Formulae (7.8) for Eq.(8.1) and (7.1) for (8.5)
respectively but with , 
 and
,
 from  satisfying
to conditions (9.14), (9.15) for irreducible GThGT solve the problem
formulated in Theorem 6 with superfunctions
 

In Theorem 6 it is shown  that the role of 
 under GNA transformations is only parametric one.
For GThGT in  under last Theorem conditions  the remarks
about minimal gauge fermion (9.16), (9.17) and on the number  of
essentially different Lagrangian surfaces (on which the property of
properness for 
 is fulfilled) are valid
as well. At last as the superfunction 
 in (9.28) one can choose
its  restriction on hypersurface  =
 that in fact is described in Theorem 5.

The following HS type system  is formally defined with respect to
 

 
not being equivalent to system (8.3) just as for the case of
 =  in Eqs.(9.22). All its
properties have been described above for Eqs.(8.3). In particular, the
generators of translations of the form (9.24), (9.26), (9.27) constructed
from Eqs.(9.29) possess literally the same
properties and having the operators (9.24), (9.26), (9.27) as the one's own
boundary conditions for  = 
respectively.

Systems (9.22) (and (9.19), (6.8) for  as well), but not (9.29)
(and (8.3) for  as
well) can be obtained from the variational problem on extremum for the
superfunctional
 

GNA transformation for 

  is not
equivalent to a possibility  of arbitrary AT realization even of phase AT
with  . Really, the invariance of antibracket does not
follow from definition of anticanonicity for
AT:    =
, , 
 , 
 
that is now connected with more than parametric dependence upon
 under ATs of elements from
  (see (9.21)).
Therefore, not only the generating equations (8.1), (8.5) do not preserve
one's form even under phase AT but the corresponding transformed HS type
system  (8.3) has not the Hamiltonian form (8.3), (9.29) in new coordinates.

Explicitly we have under AT (9.1) for 
 taking account of (9.31)
 
The 2nd summand in exponent is not described by means of GNA transformations
and therefore its exponential function does not commute with
. The only linear AT are the exceptions for above-mentioned
case. In particular, antibracket for any , 
 is invariant under linear AT and hence

 satisfies to the
equations of the same form and HS type system  constructed with respect to
this superfunction is equivalent to previous one (8.3).

For the case in question the linear phase AT (9.1) with phase
 being at most the quadratic one with respect to
superfields  satisfies to this problem. It means for gauge
fermion (9.16), (9.17) the linear choice of the gauge superfunctions
 
Therefore it is possible to simplify the form of 
for  in
superalgebra  in the main by means of GNA, GTA transformations
without violation  of Eqs.(8.1), (8.5) form.
Functional Integral, Generating Functionals

of Green's Functions 

Let us define for Abelian hypergauge given by means of superfunctions
 
in correspondence with (9.1) the generating functional (superfunction) of
Green's functions  by the formula
 
Integration measure  in (10.2a) is defined by
formal relation
 
with infinite formal product of measures with respect to all possible values
of index .
According to footnote after (9.23) the sign of  in
(10.2a) is replaced on opposite one in contrast to (9.18), (9.22).

The new additional to ,
 superfields 
 were introduced in (10.2) defined on
 and being transformed
with respect to supergroup  superfield representation 
(being conjugate to  [1,2] with respect to -even
nondegenerate bilinear form), playing the role of sources for Green's
functions (superfunctions) and possessing the properties
 
Therefore superfunction 
 belongs to
  , ,
where  is a set parametrized by various
configurations of the superfields .
In what follows we will call
 by supersources. All properties of the
superalgebra  are naturally continued onto superalgebra
.
Functional Integral of Superfunctions 

Let us define an functional integral (FI) of superfunctions as
quasi-Gaussian superfunctions on B-algebra [8] (in the framework of
perturbation theory) with given and sufficient set
of generating elements being by superfields which are transformed with
respect to completely definite supergroup  superfield representation
and depend on fixed  by scheme described, for instance, in Ref.[8,9]
for . To this end  introduce for Gaussian superfunction
 
the FI of the form
 
with -symmetric supermatrix  defined in the following
way [8]
 
The nondegeneracy of supermatrix (10.8) is defined by its
-component supermatrix [1].

Let us define the following FI
 
One can calculate by means of (10.9) the FIs of quasi-Gaussian superfunctions
of the form
 
Taking representation (10.10) into consideration we obtain the basic
relationship to calculate of arbitrary FIs in question
 
FI (10.11) satisfies to the standard properties of FI [8,9]. At first the
result
of its calculation does not depend on the integration order. The FI is
invariant under shifts of integration variable and vanishes in calculating
of the total superfield derivative on  of an
arbitrary superfunction over any of the integration trajectories. A derivative
with respect to parametric superfunction in acting on the integrand is
commutative  with the sign .
The -superfield   analog for change of variables
formula in FI is valid. The way to introduce of superfunctional
-function has the following integral representation provided by
introduction of new superfields 
 
where the equations
 
have unique solutions respectively for unknown superfields  in
the 1st subsystem in
(10.13) and for unknowns  in the 2nd one.
Generating Functionals  of Green's Functions 

Let us rewrite FI (10.2a) by means of formula (10.12) in the form
 
with both the new independent set of superantifields 
together with their derivatives on  
 and superfields , 
being by the new generating elements of corresponding B-algebra [8] and
possessing by the properties
 
The third summand in the exponent (10.14) can be rewritten with regard for
definition (10.1a) in the form
 
Remark : There is not a necessity in integration variables
 and 
for    in
FI (10.14). In addition the result of integration with respect to above
superfields is trivially equal to 
 in any case.

Introduce the generating functional (superfunction) of connected
correlated Green's functions by the relation
 
and effective action (EA) by means of Legendre transform of  with
respect to supersources  with help of the
average superfields  introduction
 
where  are expressed as functions of
 from Eq.(10.18a). From (10.18) it follows
 
Remark:  The superfunctions 
 , , 
, , 
  
and  (
 ,
 = ,
,
 = 
, 
 present the real interest. All they are obtained by
means of restriction of their analogs on hypersurface
 that corresponds to a parametric
dependence of those superfunctions upon .

Properties of Generating Functionals 

Let us define a so-called vacuum functional (superfunction)
 
Translation with respect to  of arbitrary 
 
   along integral curve
 of the HS type system (9.29) with 

, 
 
, , ,
being its integral, on a constant parameter    
 has the form(in what follows in Sec.X the value of sign
s is equal to  and is omitted unless otherwise said) 
 
and generators (right and left respectively) of this transformation are
defined by relationships
 
The change of variables in :
   = 
 corresponding to HS
type system (9.29)
 
is given with help of action of the operator 
 (7.4) and appears by AT (in the sense of definitions (9.3))
in . Really, we obtain by means of all
antibracket's properties the proof of this fact explicitly
 
With allowance made for antibracket's properties and generating equation (8.1)
for  the following formulae hold as well
 
At last in the case with  
 satisfying to master equation (6.2) and to its
consequence (6.9) the AT (10.23) not only has  the
change of variables Berezinian  [8] under AT being equal to 1
but also the unit Berezinian  for the corresponding change of variables under
the same AT realized only on the coordinates of
configuration space:  

 
In obtaining of (10.26) the representations for  of the form
(2.44a) have been made use.

But if  belongs to  and 
 is more than  then it is
necessary for equality to 1 of the expressions (10.26) to require
the fulfilment of Eq.(8.8) in question in addition to Eq.(8.1).

Theorem 7  (basic properties of ,
)

I.  For the II class GThGT  with ,
solvable HS (9.22), superfunction  


 in the representation (10.2a)
the following statements are valid:

1) integrand in FI (10.2a) for  and superfunction
 itself are invariant with respect
to AT (10.23) for , i.e. the
formulae hold
 
2) integrand in FI (10.2a) for  and
 itself are invariant with respect to
change of variables (10.23) for 
 
3) under change of the gauge fermion  by the rule
 
the such that 
satisfies to the conditions of Theorem 5 (in particular, the hypothesis
(9.13) for
 is fulfilled on 
as well) the superfunction  does not depend upon a
choice of gauge fermion  (10.29) with accuracy up to the
1st order with respect to (the sign
 is understood as follows


 = 0,  where  is  a some norm in
) 
 
II.  For GThGT formally defined with respect to 
 with
solvable HS type system (9.29) and
, 
all statements from the 1st part are valid as well:
 
under AT (10.23);
 
under change of variables (10.23);

3) in the framework of hypothesis I. 3) under formal exchange of
Theorem 5 onto Theorem 6 the following expression is valid
 
Remark:  The notation 
 for average value of an
arbitrary superfunction  
with respect to
, 

is introduced in relationships (10.30), (10.33) defined for
 = 0 by the formulae
 
These relations for  are modified to following
ones respectively
 
and in formula (10.36) it is necessary to take away from the right
the restriction .


Proof:  I.  From the formula
 
being by definition the rule of change of integration variables in FI,
from definitions (10.27b), formula (10.26b), consequence (6.9) for
Eq.(6.2) written for  it follows the
validity of  statement I. 1) (10.27a) under AT (10.23);

I. 2) Formula
 
arising from the rule for transformation of the measure in FI (10.28b) under
change of variables  (10.23), from expansion in Taylor's series of
 in powers of 
 =  in a neighbourhood
of  and from Eqs.(6.2), (6.9) written for 
 proves the correctness of (10.28a). That
fact  taking into account of specific character of AT (10.23) permits to
write equivalently for  not defined on 
(!) the formulae
 
Really regarding the operator  by
commutative with  sign  (remind that  is fixed in
FI, i.e. is the parameter) and not acting onto integration variables,
in this case , we obtain correspondingly
 
Thus one can say on invariance of  under
its translation  with respect to  along ;

I. 3) Taking into account of the relation
 
we obtain for  the representation
 
Let us perform the change of variables (10.23) in FI (10.44) now with
superfunction  . This
transformation does not appear
by AT by virtue of fulfilment of the inequality following from (10.24)
 
Properties I. 1), I. 2) for  for
arbitrary  are not fulfilled.  Operator 
 
 in (10.23) not being now represented
in the form of operator  (7.7) and therefore
does not appear  by GNA operator for .

As a result the successive chain of the equalities holds
 
Choosing  in the  form
 
and taking into account the properties for 

mentioned in proving of I. 1) and I. 2) parts of Theorem we obtain
 
that with regard of definitions (10.34), (10.35) proves the formula (10.30)
together with the I  part of the Theorem. The II  one is fulfilled
by virtue of relations obtained in proving of the I   part being
retained as well in the case of superfunctions  and
 nontrivially depending on
 and  additionally in force of
formulae (10.25b,c). In particular, the following transformations for
,  hold  under AT (10.23)
 
In proving of the property II. 3) in  (10.33) note that 

  is  constructed by means of GNA from
,
.
At last the interpretation for

in the form (10.41), (10.42) as the "integral" of HS type system (9.29)
is valid taking account of the formulae (10.49).

Corollary 7.1 

The properties 1,2,3 of Theorem 7 for 
and ,
 from the I and II parts are
retained under restriction of HS (9.22) and HS type system (9.29) to
equations
 

The corollary is proved analogously to proof of the preceding Theorem with
significant simplifications. Corresponding change of variables constructed
via shift transformation with respect to  on a constant parameter
 along (projection on  of
solutions  for (9.22), (9.29)) integral curves
 for systems (10.50) are realized by the
formulae
 
That transformation not being by AT has the unit Berezinian
(10.26b). The interpretation of the form (10.41), (10.42) for
 in question is trivial now.
The deficiencies of system (10.50) have been already mentioned (in
particular ).
It is the system to which the so-called BRST transformations in BV method
are related:
 
If instead of Eq.(6.2) for  and
Eq.(8.1) for 
 the BV
similar equations (6.11) and (8.5) are fulfilled respectively, then none of
the
properties from Theorem 7 are realized for the corresponding GThGT. In order to restore
the important part of those properties, i.e. the 2nd and the 3rd ones in
(10.28), (10.30) for GThGT with 
and in (10.32), (10.33) for formal GThGT with 

respectively it is necessary to modify the HS (9.22) and HS type system
(9.29) to  corresponding systems of the form (10.50).


Theorem 8  (basic properties of 
,

under validity of Eqs.(6.11), (8.5))

Under fulfilment of Eq.(6.11) for 
and Eq.(8.5) for  
 determining the GThGT with
restricted systems (10.50)  the following statements for 
,

are true: 

1) the integrand in FI (10.2a) determining  ,

and the last superfunctions themselves are invariant with respect to
corresponding changes of variables (10.51); 

2) vacuum functionals do not depend on a choice of the gauge in the sense of
relations (10.30), (10.33) under change of gauge fermion by the rule described
in point I. 3) of Theorem 7.


Proof  of the last statement repeats completely the proof of
preceding Theorem and its corollary with following additional corrections:

1) change of variables (10.51) possesses by non-unit Berezinian of the form
(10.26b);

2) instead of the condition that superfunctions 
appear by the
integrals for corresponding system (10.50) it is necessary to use the
Eqs.(6.11), (8.5) respectively.


 
Besides the properties described in Theorems 7,8 for
, 

  from generating  equations (6.2), (8.1) written
for  and
, 
 respectively it follows the Ward identities. They can be
obtained by 2 ways.

1)  The first one is based on the functional averaging both of generating
equation
(6.2) for the II class GThGT with 
and of Eq.(8.1) for GThGT with

. We have the sequence of equalities  taking the notation for
 in (10.50) into consideration
 
where  the rules of integration by parts in FI and
differentiation with respect to parametric superantifields 
 have been made use.  Taking into account of consequence (6.9) for
Eq.(6.2) and  with allowance made for Eq.(8.8) for GThGT defined on
 we obtain Ward identities for 
 
The functional averaging of the Eqs.(6.9) for 
as in (10.50) leads to the same result (10.54) not revealing additional
properties for  (10.53b).

Ward identities for GThGT with generating equations (6.11) for 
 and (8.5) for
, 
 are deduced by functional averaging of these equations and have
the same form (10.54).

2)  The second way is based on the use  of the following system of
 ODE in normal form constructed with respect to HS (9.22)
 
According to Theorem 7 (property I. 2)  perform a change of
variables of the form (10.23) with fixed  in the
integrand of FI (10.2a). Obtain  as the consequence  of (10.41), (10.42) the
expression
 
On the other hand the formula  being consistent with relations
(10.38), (10.42) is formally valid taking the result of expression (10.53a)
into account
 
Thus Ward identities for 
means the invariance of superfunction  with respect to
translation on  along integral curve of system (10.55).

Obtained derivations and interpretations of Ward identities are valid as well
for formal GThGT with ,
,
, 
  with Eq.(8.1).

There is not  of the similar interpretation for  (10.53b),
for formal GThGTs described in the hypotheses of Theorem 8 with restricted
system (10.50) added by the 2nd subsystem in Eqs.(10.55), as it was made in
(10.56b). However the
Ward identities in this case are deduced by means of the 2nd way under
change of variables (10.51) in FI (10.2a).

For generating functional   
,

 the Ward identities have the
same form as for 
 
For GThGT and formal GThGT described in Theorem 7 the interpretation of the
form (10.56) is valid for  as well
 
At last the Ward identities for EA
 

  with allowance made for (10.19) take the form
 
The HS type system defined with respect to superfunction
 


(and for  being by the real HS),
taking into account the fact that superantifields
 coincide with corresponding  average ones,
 
is  solvable. Ward
identities (10.59) reflect the fact that
  is the integral for system (10.60).

The functional averaging of HS (9.22) and HS type system (9.29) by the
formula (10.37) leads to corresponding systems in terms of superfunctions
   
,
 , ,
  and 
 
The comparison  of Eqs.(10.60) with (10.63) leads to equality of their
left-hand sides
 
indicating on the permutability of averaging  sign with operator
 on the coordinates of
 along .  Further
investigation of systems (10.60), (10.63) and the connection of corresponding
generators  and   appear
by the separate problems.

Finally, relation (10.58) for  EA  taking the   Legendre
transform properties (10.18), (10.19) into consideration has the form
 
Thus, Ward  identities for   mean the invariance
of EA, in the sense of conventions (10.42), with respect to translation on
 along integral curve  of corresponding
system (9.22), (9.29).  Moreover the solutions of system (10.60) appear
exactly by !

Not going into details let us remark that properties of Theorem 7 for

written in the form (10.14) taking account of the formula (10.16) follow from
the next transformations of invariance for integrand written by means of
the 1st order on  system   ODE
 
where 
 and


satisfies to the hypotheses of Theorem 4 (for
 
 to the conditions of Theorem 3).
Moreover
, 
 may satisfy to Eqs.(6.11) or (8.5)
nevertheless the same system (10.66) induces the invariance of integrand in
(10.14) with respect to corresponding to (10.66) change of variables.
Note that even the subsystem (10.66a) is not solvable.

By another important system of  ODE of the 1st order on 
with the same variables, that in (10.66) and playing the same role as one
(10.66) it appears the system having following nonzero right-hand side
part
 
This system does not satisfy to solvability condition but coincides
one-to-one with BRST transformations in BV method for

 in form (10.14) taking the type (10.52) formula into
consideration for 
, .
Component Formulation of GSQM 

The component (on ) formulation of GSTF constructed in papers [1,2]
for objects and relations defined on , ,
,  is
directly transferred without any modifications on quantities and operations
determined on , ,
, ,
 (2.27), (2.30) introduced in present work basically in Sec.II.
For completeness of presentation let us point out the following component on
 representation for supervariables ,
,  (10.4), (10.15)
 
Reduction to BV Method and to Superfield 

Quantization  from Paper [3] 

GSQM in the Lagrangian formalism contains as the particular cases the BV
method [4] and the Lagrangian superfield method [3] for gauge theories
quantization.
Connection with BV Method 

In order to pass to BV method inside of GSQM it
is necessary to restrict 

being used for description of GThGT (including the II class ones)
with  or superalgebra 
being used for formal GThGT with

 to . In the
restricted superalgebra  all possible products of 
 form the basis and all superfunctions are defined for 
.  It is the same superalgebra appears for
 =  by maximal
subsuperalgebra in  being invariant one with respect to
involution  (2.42). Thus  the BV method quantities are singled out
in the invariant way as superfunctions from 
 being invariant with respect to .
Elements of  are
represented in the form
 
and appear by functionals in the usual sense for , i.e. by mappings
from  into  ( or
) being used in BV method.

From the 1st and 2nd orders operators  and various kinds of antibrackets
consider only ,
,  and
following ones acting nontrivially on 

 
Projectors   take the values under restriction onto

 
The global symmetry supergroup  and superspace  are restricted by
 and  respectively.
The superalgebras ,
, 
 pass  into  ,
, 
  correspondingly. All
superfunctionals of the form (2.40) vanish identically. The concepts
of works [1,2] about Lagrangian and Hamiltonian formalism for GSTF with
respect to  GThGT and GThST in fact are reduced to standard definition of
gauge theory of special type for  appearing by the irreducible
general gauge theory in the usual sense [4,7,8].
Moreover the so-called HCLF and being equal to them
HCHF
 
are the ordinary equations of motion for gauge theory being described by
functional 
given on  appearing by potential term for
 (2.13) or for
  (4.4).

It is not possible to pass from Lagrangian formalism of description for
restricted GThGT on  into Hamiltonian
one by means of Legendre transform of functional  with
respect to   
 in view of absence of
the latter fields.  As consequence of this fact it is impossible to
introduce the usual antifields  according to above-mentioned
scheme for equivalent formulation of GThGT in Hamiltonian formalism as well.
However, if it is not formally to assume 
 then the Legendre transform of
 on  with
respect to  is possible.

The following functionals taking Existence Theorems 1,2 for 
into account
 
appear by the solutions for classical master equations [4,7] of BV method
written by means of antibracket (12.2) in
,  respectively.
On the other hand BV method is based on equation of the form (6.11) for
 and .  In the last case
 = 

 (5.15) is not the restriction of the corresponding superfunction
determining the II class GThGT. Theorem 3 is valid for
 under replacement of Eq.(6.2)
onto Eq.(6.11)  respectively
 
The results of Sec.X are reduced to corresponding relations for standard
version of the Lagrangian  quantization (for
 if the formal GThGT with

have been made use) for   and under following identifications
 
where ,  and  are the usual sources to
-components of Green's functions and auxiliary Lagrangian
multipliers introducing the gauge in BV method  respectively.

FI (10.2a) appears by usually defined [8], in fulfilling of the mentioned
correspondences and restrictions, and its equivalent form (10.14) coincides
after integration with respect to  and 
 (in omitting the normalization constant
) with generating functional of
Green's functions in BV method. Representations for  (10.2a),
(10.14) have the form respectively
 
The 2nd summand in the integrand (12.8c) with account of (12.7b), (2.41a) and
results of Sec.XI can be rewritten as follows
 
Ward identities for generating functionals ,
, 
 (two
latters are defined analogously to  (12.8a)) will be written in
the form
 
The corresponding to BV method system (10.50) for 

(12.8b) and system (10.67), (10.66b) for  in the
form (12.8c) will pass to standard BRST transformations, under following
formal identification
 
for  given in both forms (12.8b) and (12.8c)
respectively
 
Connection with  Lagrangian Superfield Quantization [3] 

It is easy to determine the correlation of GSQM with quantities and relations
of the  Lagrangian quantization superfield variant [3]  by means of the
formulae from corresponding sections devoted to component formulation of
GSTF [1,2] and remarks from Sec.XI.

Namely the operators , ,  from method [3] being denoted further
with index "LMR" are connected with ,
,  (2.41) by
means of the formulae
 
These equalities are valid in acting on superfunctions from  and
superfunctionals of the form (2.40).

Functionals "" which had been made use in the method  [3]
appear in the framework of GSQM terminology by -components of
superfunctions from . It means that the representation from
Sec.VIII of Ref.[2] of the form being dictated by formula (8.1) [2] with
 is true for those functionals. To be
more precisely there exists for any  from the method
[3] the  such corresponding  superfunction 
 that the following identities hold
 
conforming with (12.1) but without restriction
.

For antibracket  [3] we have (from formula (8.10)
of Sec.VIII Ref.[2])
 
In fact the main object of the method [3] being by functional
 is connected with

from GSQM, satisfying to BV similar equation (8.5), by means of relation
conforming with (12.15),  with transformation rule for operators
,  (2.50),
(2.51) and with expressions (5.16), (5.17) (in addition see the formulae of
Sec.VII from paper [2])
 
Really  satisfies by virtue of above expressions
(2.50), (2.51) and (12.14) as well to
generating equation of the method [3]
 

FIs (10.2a), (10.14) for 
 are not in general
reduced to the generating functional of Green's functions
 from paper [3] using the representation for
 of the form (10.14). Really write
 ,
 in the form (10.14)
under condition that
gauge is imposed with help of GNA (7.1)
 
In this case one can regard that the
superfunction  from  has the form  
 
without loss of the Eq.(8.5) validity.
In obtaining of (12.19) it was integrated over ,
 in the FI (10.14) in omitting
of .
Relationships (12.7) and
being analogous ones for , ,
 were taken into account
together with
rule (12.15) for .

The comparison of FI (12.19) with component formulation for 
 from Ref.[3] having the following form  with regard for
formula (12.17)
 
shows that the very strong constraints must be fulfilled in order to the
right-hand sides of the expressions (12.19) and (12.20) would coincide.
Namely it is necessary to fulfill the identities
 
the such that the first of them are equivalent to the following ones
 

The corresponding BRST transformations for
 have the form (12.13) under
change of  onto

that with accuracy up to sign coincides with invariance transformations for
 written in [3] with superfunction
 defined in (12.17).
All other relations for ,
,

 obtained
in Subsec.XII.1, namely, the Ward identities have the same form as in
(12.10).

The definition of generating functional of Green's functions by means of
relations (12.20) but written
in "superfield form" in terminology of the Ref.[3]
 
although  coincides with FI of the BV method (12.8c) on the hypersurface
defined by equations  but out of
the last equations leads to the functional dependence in a non-parametric way
upon  component fields. It means, in particular, that the
presence of  in functional  =
 leads to the method for imposing of the
gauge being differred both from the phase AT (9.1) and from GNA (9.10) that
diverges
with ideology of interpretation of transition from one Lagrangian surface  to
another in the sense of statements from Theorems 5,6. Furthermore this fact
appears by obstacle to introduction in superfield form the generating
functional of vertex Green's functions   in the framework
of the method [3].

GSTF Models in  GSQM 

Continue the investigation of the models from papers [1,2] in the context of
the quantum theory construction in the framework of GSQM in the Lagrangian
formalism by means of FI.
Massive Complex Scalar Superfield Models 

It had been shown in papers [1,2] that given GSTF models appear by
nondegenerate ThST (theory of special type), i.e. nongauge one. Therefore
for construction of the quantum
description in terms of generating functionals of Green's functions
there are not necessity to extend .

Instead of two cases for the free model and for one with interaction let us
consider the latter ThST which includes the former one.
It is sufficient to realize the 1st stage of the construction procedure for
quantum theory with respect to that I class ThST (see Sec.IV). The model is
described by superfunction
 on  parametrized by
complex scalar  superfields , 
   given
on  [1] with zero ghost
number and complex scalar(the sign of complex conjugation for
quantity :  in this subsection is
differred both from the sign of special involution  in Sec.II being
denoted as  and from the sign of superantifield
"")  superantifields ,
  
 [2] with ghost number being equal to .
Superfunction  has the form [2]
 
The ghost number distribution for kinetic  and potential 
 parts of  reads as follows
 
Eq.(4.3a) is trivially fulfilled in the given example whereas the
superfunction  =  defining the
II class GThST with being simply obtained restricted GHS (4.5) [2]
 
appears by solution for Eq.(4.3b).

Because the supermatrix of the 2nd partial superfield derivatives of
 with respect to ,
 is nondegenerate [1] then it is possible to
construct the FI  (10.2a) or (10.14).
Generating functional of Green's functions  for interacting
complex
scalar superfield does not depend upon superantifields and additional
supervariables from .  is explicitly calculated
according to the formula (10.11) as FI of quasi-Gaussian superfunction (10.10)
 
The functional determinant in (13.8a) being by a constant normalization
factor usually is ignored in the formula writing in the expression for
. Superfunction 
appears by the Green's function in Feynman representation for Klein-Gordon
operator.

The supesources , 
 are the complex
scalars from  possessing
by the properties
 
making under identification 
 the restricted -component 
 by coinciding with standard generating functional of Green's
functions for complex scalar field 
.

The invariance transformations of the BRST type for  (13.8a)
corresponding to the system (10.50) are trivial
 
Formulae (13.1)-(13.10) for  correspond to the free model
quantum description.
Massive Spinor Superfield of Spin  Models 

From Ref.[1,2] it follows that given GSTF models appear by singular
nondegenerate, i.e. nongauge ones.
In such case it is sufficient to realize the 1st stage of the construction
procedure for quantum theory with respect to the I class ThSTs in question
in the initial .

The interacting model is described by superfunction
 on  parametrized
by superfields ,  and
superantifields ,
 from
 with ghost number being
equal to 0 and  respectively.
These supervariables appear by Dirac bispinors [1,2]. Superfunction
 has the form [2]
 
Kinetic  and potential  parts of
 possess by the same  ghost numbers values
as the corresponding superfunctions in (13.6).

Eq.(4.3a) is trivially fulfilled for the model in question whereas the
superfunction  = 
defines the II class GThST  providing the fulfilment of the Eq.(4.3b) with
being simply obtained restricted GHS (4.5).
That GHS has the representation
 
Since the supermatrix of the 2nd partial superfield derivatives of
 with respect to
,  is nondegenerate
almost everywhere in  [1] it is possible to
construct the FI (10.2a) or (10.14) in the framework of GSQM in the
Lagrangian formalism.
Generating functional of Green's functions  for
interacting spinor superfield does not depend upon superantifields
and additional
superfields from .  is explicitly
calculated according to formula (10.11) as FI of quasi-Gaussian superfunction
(10.10)
 
The functional determinant in (13.17a) is usually considered
as a normalization constant  and therefore is omitted.
Superfunction  appears by Green's function for Dirac operator.

Supersources , 
 to , 
are the Dirac bispinors possessing the properties
 
where bar, for instance, over   appears
in this subsection by Dirac conjugation in contrast to its use in
Subsec.XIII.1.

The concluding remarks of the preceding subsection together with
connection for free model quantum description and with the
trivial system corresponding to BRST type transformations are valid in this
case with corresponding modifications.
Free Vector Superfield Models 

Superfield models of massless and massive vector superfields

 given on  = , 
  had been considered in details  in Lagrangian [1]
and Hamiltonian [2] formulations of GSTF.

Let us begin from the case of massless theory. It had been shown that the
model in question appears by the I class GThST with GGTST
 
The only superfunction  below is invariant
under GTST according to [1,2].

In Hamiltonian formulation the model is described for , 
N by superfunction
 defined on 
parametrized
by superfields  with zero ghost number and by
superantifields  with ghost number being
equal to .  has the form in this case [2]
 
For , N it is possible  to
realize the program of Secs.II,IV for transition to the quantum
description as
well but starting directly from Lagrangian formulation of the model with

 given on  = 
, 
[1] and having the form
 
The distribution of ghost number values for
,
,
 are given by the expression
 
The 1st stage of the procedure from Sec.IV for construction the II class
GThST is fulfilled by virtue  of equation (4.3a) triviality and choice as
the solution for Eq.(4.3b) [for  it is necessary to replace instead of
 the superfunction  in (4.3b)]
of the superfunction  = 
 taking account of (13.25).
Restricted GHS (4.5) has the form in this case
 
By virtue of existence of the nontrivial generator of GTST (13.19) it follows
that this theory
is the irreducible one with Abelian gauge algebra (
 = 
=  in (4.38)).

It is necessary in correspondence with Sec.II and prescription (2.22) to
associate with GGTST (13.19) in every point  the  superfields
, ,  and their 3
superantifields , ,
 having the following table of ,
, ,  gradings
 
The 1st order on  system from 4 ODE  (2.21) corresponding to GTST
[1,2]
 
has the form
 
and is transformed to system of the form (4.10)
 
The 2nd stage of the above-mentioned procedure permits with allowance made
for
commutativity of the gauge algebra to write down the unified system
containing (13.26a) and (13.30a) already in form of HS
in  = ,
, ,
, i.e. to realize simultaneously the third stage
of the algorithm in question
 
with superfunction 
 
 satisfies both to master equation (4.30) and to its
consequence (4.33) with
use of the continued antibracket  and operator

[2] from  to 
 
Therefore, HS (13.31) is solvable and  appears by its
integral. Superfunction 
 
is the solution for master equation (5.2) in 
and its consequence of the type (4.33) with corresponding antibracket and
operator 
 
 can be chosen as the solution for analogous quantum
equations (6.2), (6.9). This superfunction satisfies to BV similar equation
(6.11) as well so that the difference between the forms of the mentioned
generating equations (for GSQM and for direct superfield generalization of
the BV master equation) is not essential in that example.

To construct the  let us perform the linear phase AT
(9.1) with gauge fermion being quadratic with respect to superfields according
to general formulae (9.17), (9.33)
 
with arbitrary matrix  not depending upon
. Corresponding  has the
form
 
Let us write the only physical interesting generating functional of Green's
functions for free massless vector superfield in the form (10.2a) with help of
the last  expression
 
with following table of gradings for supersources
 
 (13.39) is the FI of Gaussian superfunction
 and is explicitly calculated according to formula
(10.6). Let us calculate  this FI in the so-called Lorentz gauge
corresponding  to , 
 
Considering all functional determinants in (13.41a) as the normalization
constants usually one does not write them in (13.41a). The superfunctions
, 
 (13.41c) are the Green's
functions in Feynman representation for ghost superfields ,
 and for massless vector superfields
 (for   is the
Green's function for free electromagnetic superfield in Lorentz gauge).

Corresponding to Theorem 7 invariance transformations for 
 are based on the type (9.22) system  having the form in this case
 
The ODE system being used in BV method are obtained from (13.42) by means of
vanishing of the right-hand sides in Eqs.(13.42b). Corresponding to
Eqs.(13.42) invariance transformations for  with
 being by an integral curve for this system have the
form
 
The superfield BRST transformations being used in BV method for
 follow from (13.43) in vanishing of the right-hand sides in the
expressions (13.43b).

Ward identity for  and component formulation are
obtained in the obvious way according to Secs.X,XI.

For construction of the generating functional of Green's functions
 in the case of free massive vector superfield 

 theory as the singular nondegenerate ThST described in Lagrangian
[1] and Hamiltonian [2] formulations for GSTF it is sufficient to fulfill the
only 1st step of the procedure from Sec.IV.

As far as the -superfield Proca  model is nongauge one then there are
not any gauge transformations and therefore the formulae (13.19),
(13.28)-(13.38) are not valid in question. The given ThST formulation is
defined by the formulae (13.20)-(13.22) for Hamiltonian formalism and
(13.23), (13.24) for Lagrangian one in which it is necessary to replace the
superfunctions , , 
 onto ,
,  of the form
[1,2]
 
The distribution of ghost number values of the form (13.25) remains valid in
this case so that the superfunction  = 
 is the solution for Eq.(4.3b).
The restricted GHS (4.5) has the form in question
 
In view of the nongauge character of the model it is not required the
introduction of the superfields , ,
 and their superantifields. Therefore from the table (13.27) it
is necessary to retain the only gradings for ,
.
The remarks for quantization of the model for odd and even values of
dimension  being used in massless theory remains valid in this case.

To calculate the generating functional of Green's functions
 for free massive vector superfield in the form
(10.2a) not being dependent from the superantifields
 
with corresponding supersources  having the
properties as in (13.40) it is sufficient to make use the formula (10.6) for
FI of Gaussian superfunction. The final result has the form
 
The functional  determinant in (13.49)  may be omitted if to consider it as
the normalization constant. Superfunction 
appears by causal Green's function for massive vector superfield with
allowance made for condition  [1].
The superfield BRST transformations for the superfunction (13.48) is trivial.

Restriction of the considered quantum superfield models  to ordinary ones
from gauge fields theory is established by means of involution  or by
simple setting  in all relations and quantities of this section
taking  of Sec.XI and Subsec.XII.1 into account.
Conclusion 

On the basis of GSTF [1,2] the direct rules of GSQM for superfield (on
) gauge theories in the Lagrangian (in the usual sense) formalism,
i.e.
for the GThGT and GThST in terminology of papers [1,2] are constructed. To
this end the new interpretation for extension of supermanifold
 to , ,
 is proposed together with explicit group-theoretic
construction of the ghost number in question.

The procedure for construction of the II class GThGT defined on
 and next on 
starting from the original I class GThGT (GThST) defined on
,  is successively
formulated in the framework of GSTF and
mathematical means developed in Ref.[1,2] in the form of exact algorithm.

The
series of the Existence Theorems in explicit formulation both for the
generating
equations of GSQM and for the BV similar master equations are formulated. The
deformation of the obtained GThGT into the supermanifolds
, , ,
 in powers of  is realized. The
crucial role of the HS and HS type systems is demonstrated for superfield
interpretation of BRST similar transformations.

The arbitrariness in solutions of above-mentioned generating equations is
described by means of operations of GNA and GTA. It was shown the
anticanonical transformations
and GNA play principal
role in the covariant formulation of quantum theory in constructing of
the generating functionals of Green's functions.

The procedure to impose the gauge, being interpreted as a choice of
different Lagrangian surfaces on which the Hesse supermatrix of superfunction
 is nondegenerate, is realized by means of ATs and
GNA.

The definition of functional integral of superfunctions in the framework of
perturbation theory is introduced for GSQM. With its help the main GSQM
object being by superfunction 
is written  by means of FI.

The nontrivial properties of that superfunction are studied in details. They
contain the new ones. The additional interpretation
for Ward identities is obtained as the invariance of
 with respect to translation
transformation relative to
odd time  on an arbitrary parameter 
along integral curve of solvable HS built with respect to quantum gauge fixed
action . It should be noted  the last
transformation is the special anticanonical transformation in GSQM with
one's generator  and unit
Berezinian.

For the first time it is introduced in the superfield form the effective
action  
for which the Ward identities repeat the master equations for
 in GSQM. This fact makes by possible the
construction of
HS with respect to   and obtaining the quantum
BRST similar transformations in space parametrized by average supervariables
. The analogous objects were obtained and
considered in fulfilling of BV similar generating equations and for deformed
GThGT with respect to   as well.

Component formulation of GSQM was proposed. The inclusion of the BV method
into
GSQM is established. Detailed connection with superfield method of the
Lagrangian quantization from Ref.[3] is obtained with simultaneous
description of its problem moments. The examples of the GSTF models for
free and interacting scalar, spinor superfields and for free massless and
massive  vector superfields
suggested in [1,2] have been developed in context of the demonstration of
the general rules for quantization  constructed in Secs.II-XI.

Acknowledgments: 
Author is very grateful to Mishchuk B. for discussion of some results of the
present paper.

 
References  
 
A.A. Reshetnyak, General Superfield Quantization Method. I. General
Superfield Theory of Fields: Lagrangian Formalism, hep-th/0210207.
A.A. Reshetnyak, General Superfield Quantization Method. II. General
Superfield Theory of Fields: Hamiltonian Formalism, hep-th/0303262.
P.M. Lavrov, P.Yu. Moshin and A.A. Reshetnyak, Mod. Phys. Lett. A10
(1995) 2687; JETP Lett. 62 (1995) 780.
I.A. Batalin and G.A. Vilkovisky,
Phys. Lett. B 102 (1981) 27.
C.N. Yang and R. Mills, Phys. Rev. 96 (1954) 191; R. Utiyama, Phys. Rev.
101 (1956) 1597.
I.A. Batalin and G.A. Vilkovisky,  Phys. Rev. D 28 (1983) 2567.
I.A. Batalin and G.A. Vilkovisky, J. Math. Phys. 26 (1985) 172.
D.M. Gitman and I.V. Tyutin,
Quantization of Fields with Constraints (Springer-Verlag, Berlin and
Heidelberg, 1990).
A.A. Slavnov, Teor. Mat. Fiz. 22 (1975) 177.
